Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 1 STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
33-125B. Pay for success contracting — Duties of the state department of education.

The state department of education may enter into contracts for approved services. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 92, title 67, Idaho Code, the department may issue a request for information for a contract upon identification of a need for a special service, or interested parties may identify a need for service within the department and submit a proposal to the department to negotiate a contract. Any contract entered into pursuant to this section shall provide for:

An evidence-based program delivered by the service provider designed to enhance student academic achievement;

Mutually agreed upon grade-level performance targets and efficacy standards;

Identified source of moneys from which savings will be realized;

An external evaluator who shall have expertise in all of the following areas:

Education;

Program evaluation and assessment;

Collection and maintenance of program data;

Demonstrated ability to link an individual student’s data from grade to grade; and

Knowledge of the Idaho-specific academic performance scores used to demonstrate efficacy of the service provider’s program;

The state’s payment obligations from the money appropriated to the public school support program, if the efficacy standards are met under the contract;

Terms under which the state may terminate the contract;

An annual audit to be performed by a certified public accountant; and

A mutually agreed upon formula for the distribution of savings realized by the service provider program.

Investor moneys shall be adequate to cover all contract costs.

The third-party administrator shall:

Manage all moneys pursuant to subsection (2) of this section;

When appropriate, direct payments to be made under the terms of the contract;

Ensure an annual audit is conducted under the terms of the contract;

Issue financial reports as required by the contract; and

Complete all other compliance requirements of state or federal law.

The department shall approve the school district or public charter school from which each cohort will be chosen. The priority for selection shall be given to:

School districts or public charter schools reporting the greatest number of students who are not proficient to meet grade-level performance targets being used to evaluate the service provider’s program;

School districts or public charter schools reporting the greatest number of students on free and reduced lunch; and

School districts or public charter schools in different regions of the state.
The selection of cohorts shall be made by mutual agreement between the service provider, the approved school district or public charter school and the department.

The department shall withhold distributions to participating school districts or public charter schools for the intervention or remediation efforts identified in the contract. Moneys shall be held in the public school income fund until the external evaluator makes a determination under this subsection. If the external evaluator determines that the efficacy standards have been met, the moneys shall be distributed pursuant to the terms of the contract. If the external evaluator determines that the efficacy standards have not been met, the moneys will be released to the school district or public charter school. Moneys withheld or distributed from this fund shall be subject to appropriation and shall not be included in public school discretionary funding variability pursuant to section 33-1018, Idaho Code. If the contract is terminated for any reason other than the achievement or nonachievement of the efficacy standards, the moneys shall be distributed according to the terms of the contract governing such an event.

The external evaluator shall:

Determine whether the service provider has met the agreed upon efficacy standards under the terms of the contract by determining the outcomes for each cohort based on the following criteria:

Whether there was an increase in the number of children proficient to meet grade-level performance targets at levels specified in the contract; and

Calculate savings realized for intervention or remediation as specified in the contract;

Annually report the service provider efficacy standards to the department; and

Report the service provider efficacy standards to the third-party administrator for the purpose of determining whether payment should be made under the terms of the contract.

An oversight committee is hereby created for the purpose of deciding whether or not the state department of education will enter into a negotiation with an interested party under this section, and for the purpose of monitoring contracts entered into under this section. The committee shall meet as often as is necessary to fulfill its obligations under this subsection. The committee shall consist of the following people:

The chief financial officer of the state department of education;

The subject matter expert at the state department of education;

A representative from the state controller’s office;

The house of representatives education committee chairman; and

The senate education committee chairman.

The state department of education shall report to the legislature on or before February 1 of each year on all contracts entered into pursuant to this section.

The state board of education may promulgate rules implementing the provisions of this section.

As used in this section:

“Cohort” means a group of individuals who enter the service provider’s program on the same date.

“Department” means the state department of education.

“External evaluator” means the entity that is responsible for determining the efficacy of a service provider’s program.

“Investor” means an individual or entity that provides the capital for the services specified in a contract.

“Service provider” means an organization that implements an evidenced-based program that conforms to the terms of the contract.
(f) “Third-party administrator” means an SSAE-16 compliant firm or a firm licensed under chapter 2, title 54, Idaho Code, that manages all moneys deposited pursuant to this section and controlled by a contract.

An external evaluator shall approve the negotiated contract provisions relating to efficacy standards before the department may enter into any such contract.

33-126. Organization of department.

The state department of education shall be organized in a manner as determined by the state board of education acting on the recommendations of the executive secretary.

33-127. Employees.

Employees of the department shall be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with the provisions of chapter 16, title 59, and chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code.

33-128. Statement of public purpose.

The Idaho constitution established a system of free common schools recognizing that “the stability of a republican form of government depends mainly upon the intelligence of the people.” The legislature finds that there is a need for expanded educational experiences including a need for additional positive science education experiences for the youth of this state. The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to encourage science education opportunities through cooperative efforts with private nonprofit organizations offering science education programs.

33-129. Matching grants for science education programs — Grant criteria.

The state department of education shall administer a program of matching grants to encourage the expansion or maintenance of science education programs in the state of Idaho. Matching grants shall only be made to nonprofit corporations incorporated or registered in the state of Idaho and which shall have conducted such a science education program for a minimum of one (1) year. Grants shall require the applicant to provide at least one-half (½) of the financial support for the science education program with money or in-kind contributions.

“Science education programs” include, but are not limited to, demonstration programs intended to encourage knowledge of and interest in the disciplines of science among Idaho’s elementary and secondary school students.

The state department of education shall administer this program with such funds as are appropriated to the science education program. Competing grant applications shall be evaluated and funding decisions shall be made based upon the department’s judgment as to the probable effectiveness of the various proposals in furthering the purposes of this act.

33-130. Criminal history checks for school district employees or applicants for certificates or individuals having contact with students — Statewide list of substitute teachers.

The department of education, through the cooperation of the Idaho state police, shall establish a system to obtain a criminal history check on individuals to include, but is not limited to, certificated and noncertificated employees, all applicants for certificates pursuant to chapter 12, title 33, Idaho Code, substitute staff, individuals involved in other types of student training such as practicums and internships, and on all individuals who have unsupervised contact with students in a K-12 setting. The criminal history check shall be based on a completed ten (10) finger fingerprint card or scan and shall include, at a minimum, the following state and national databases:

Idaho bureau of criminal identification;

Federal bureau of investigation (FBI) criminal history check; and

Statewide sex offender register.

The state department of education shall charge all such individuals a fee necessary to cover the cost of undergoing a criminal history check pursuant to this section. The total fee shall be sufficient to cover the net costs charged by the federal bureau of investigation and the state police. A record of all background checks shall be maintained at the state department of education in a data bank for all employees of a school district with a copy going to the employing school district, when requested at the time of the application or within six (6) months following the performance of the criminal history check. A copy shall also be provided to the applicant upon request.

The state department of education shall maintain a statewide list of substitute teachers. The term “substitute teacher” shall have the meaning as provided in section 33-512(15), Idaho Code.

The Idaho state police and the department of education shall implement a joint exercise of powers agreement pursuant to sections 67-2328 through 67-2333, Idaho Code, necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

33-130A. Criminal history checks for private or parochial school employees or contractors.

If requested by the principal or governing board of a private or parochial school, the department of education, through the cooperation of the department of law enforcement [Idaho state police], shall establish a system to obtain a criminal history check on employees of the school or persons entering into contracts with the school. The criminal history check and fees shall be as provided in section 33-130, Idaho Code.

33-131. Definitions — Tribal school — Tribal education authority.

“Tribal school” means an institution with an educational program that has as its primary purpose providing education in any grade or grades from kindergarten to twelfth grade and that is controlled by the elected governing body of a federally recognized American Indian tribe in Idaho or by a tribal education authority established under the laws of a federally recognized American Indian tribe in Idaho.

“Tribal educational authority” means the authorized governmental agency of a federally recognized Indian tribe, as defined in 25 U.S.C. section 450b, that is primarily responsible for:

Regulating, administering or supervising the formal education of tribal members;

Facilitating tribal control in all matters relating to the education of Indian children;

Providing for the development and coordinated education programs, including all preschool, elementary, secondary and higher or vocational programs, funded by the United States bureau of Indian affairs and encouraging tribal cooperation and coordination with entities carrying out all educational programs receiving financial support from other general agencies, state agencies or private entities; and

Providing for the development and enforcement of tribal education codes relating to the education of Indian children, including tribal education policies and tribal standards applicable to curriculum, personnel, students, facilities and support programs.

33-132. Local school boards — Internet use policy required.

As a condition for receiving moneys from the state general fund, each local school district shall file an acceptable internet use policy with the state superintendent of public instruction no later than August 1, 2011, or within one (1) year after the creation of a new district, whichever is later, and every five (5) years thereafter. Such policy shall be approved by the district’s board of trustees and shall contain, but not be limited to, provisions that:

Prohibit and prevent the use of school computers and other school owned technology-related services from sending, receiving, viewing or downloading materials that are deemed to be harmful to minors, as defined by section 18-1514, Idaho Code; and

Provide for the selection of technology for the local district’s computers to filter or block internet access to obscene materials, materials harmful to minors and materials that depict the sexual exploitation of a minor, as defined in chapter 15, title 18, Idaho Code; and

Establish appropriate disciplinary measures to be taken against persons violating the policy provided for in this section; and

Include a component of internet safety for students that is integrated into the district’s instructional program; and

Inform the public that administrative procedures have been adopted to enforce the policy provided for in this section and to handle complaints about such enforcement, and that such procedures are available for review at the district office.

The policy provided for in subsection (1) of this section may include terms, conditions and requirements deemed appropriate by the district’s board of trustees including, but not limited to, requiring written parental authorization for internet use by minors or differentiating acceptable uses among elementary, middle and high school students.

The district’s superintendent is hereby authorized to take reasonable measures to implement and enforce the provisions of this section.

33-133. Definitions — Student data — Use and limitations — Penalties.

As used in this act, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Agency” means each state board, commission, department, office or institution, educational or otherwise, of the state of Idaho. State agency shall also mean any city, county, district or other political subdivision of the state.

“Aggregate data” means data collected and/or reported at the group, cohort or institutional level. Aggregate data shall not include personally identifiable information. The minimum number of students shall be determined by the state board of education.

“Board” means the state board of education.

“Data system” means the state’s elementary, secondary and postsecondary longitudinal data systems.

“Department” means the state department of education.

“District” or “school district” means an Idaho public school district and shall also include Idaho public charter schools.

“Parent” means parent, parents, legal guardian or legal guardians.

“Personally identifiable data,” “personally identifiable student data” or “personally identifiable information” includes, but is not limited to: the student’s name; the name of the student’s parent or other family members; the address of the student or student’s family; a personal identifier, such as the student’s social security number, student education unique identification number or biometric record; other indirect identifiers, such as the student’s date of birth, place of birth and mother’s maiden name; and other information that, alone or in combination, is linked or linkable to a specific student that would allow a reasonable person in the school community, who does not have personal knowledge of the relevant circumstances, to identify the student with reasonable certainty or information requested by a person who the educational agency or institution reasonably believes knows the identity of the student to whom the education record relates.

“Provisional student data” means new student data proposed for inclusion in the data system.

“Student data” means data collected and/or reported at the individual student level included in a student’s educational record.

“Student data” includes: (1) state and national assessment results, including information on untested public school students; (2) course taking and completion, credits earned and other transcript information; (3) course grades and grade point average; (4) date of birth, grade level and expected graduation date/graduation cohort; (5) degree, diploma, credential attainment and other school exit information such as general educational development and drop-out data; (6) attendance and mobility; (7) data required to calculate the federal four (4) year adjusted secondary cohort graduation rate, including sufficient exit information; (8) discipline reports limited to objective information sufficient to produce the federal annual incident reports, children with disabilities disciplinary reports and discipline reports including students involved with firearms; (9) remediation; (10) special education data; (11) demographic data and program participation information; and (12) files, documents, images or data containing a student’s educational record that are stored in or transmitted through a cloud computing service.

A student’s educational record shall not include: (1) juvenile delinquency records and criminal records unless required in paragraph (k) of this subsection; (2) medical and health records; (3) student social security number; (4) student biometric information; (5) gun ownership records; (6) sexual orientation; (7) religious affiliation; (8) except for special needs and exceptional students, any data collected pursuant to a statewide assessment via affective computing, including analysis of facial expressions, EEG brain wave patterns, skin conductance, galvanic skin response, heart rate variability, pulse, blood volume, posture and eye tracking, any data that measures psychological resources, mind sets, effortful control, attributes, dispositions, social skills, attitudes or intrapersonal resources.
(k) “Student educational record” means all information directly related to a student and recorded and kept in the data system as that term is defined in this section. Provided however, that the following shall not be kept as part of a student’s permanent educational record: daily assignments, homework, reports, chapter tests or similar assessments or other schoolwork that may be considered daily or weekly work. A student educational record may include information considered to be personally identifiable.

“Student educational record” means all information directly related to a student and recorded and kept in the data system as that term is defined in this section. Provided however, that the following shall not be kept as part of a student’s permanent educational record: daily assignments, homework, reports, chapter tests or similar assessments or other schoolwork that may be considered daily or weekly work. A student educational record may include information considered to be personally identifiable.

“Student education unique identification number” means the unique student identifier assigned by the state to each student that shall not be or include the social security number of a student in whole or in part.

“Violation” means an act contrary to the provisions of this section that materially compromises the security, confidentiality or integrity of personally identifiable data of one (1) or more students and that results in the unauthorized release or disclosure of such data.

Unless otherwise provided for in this act, the executive office of the state board of education shall be the entity responsible for implementing the provisions of this act. All decisions relating to the collection and safeguarding of student data shall be the responsibility of the executive office of the state board of education.

The state board of education shall:

Create, publish and make publicly available a data inventory and dictionary or index of data elements with definitions of individual student data fields currently in the student data system including:

Any individual student data required to be reported by state and federal education mandates;

Any individual student data that has been proposed for inclusion in the student data system with a statement regarding the purpose or reason for the proposed collection; and

Any individual student data collected or maintained with no current purpose or reason.

Develop, publish and make publicly available policies and procedures to comply with the federal family educational rights and privacy act (FERPA) and other relevant privacy laws and policies including, but not limited to the following:

Access to student data in the student data system shall be restricted to: (1) the authorized staff of the state board of education and the state department of education and the board’s and the department’s vendors who require such access to perform their assigned duties; (2) the district and the district’s private vendors who require access to perform their assigned duties and public postsecondary staff who require such access to perform their assigned duties; (3) students and their parents or legal guardians; and (4) the authorized staff of other state agencies in this state as required by law and/or defined by interagency data-sharing agreements. All such data-sharing agreements shall be summarized in a report compiled by the state board of education and submitted no later than January 15 of each year to the senate education committee and the house of representatives education committee;
(ii) Provide that public reports or responses to record requests shall include aggregate data only as that term is defined in subsection (1) of this section;

Develop criteria for the approval of research and data requests from state and local agencies, the state legislature, researchers and the public: (1) unless otherwise approved by the state board of education, student data maintained shall remain confidential; (2) unless otherwise approved by the state board of education, released student data in response to research and data requests may include only aggregate data; and (3) any approval of the board to release personally identifiable student data shall be subject to legislative approval prior to the release of such information;

Ensure that any contract entered into by the state board of education or the state department of education includes provisions requiring and governing data destruction dates and specific restrictions on the use of data;

Provide for notification to students and parents regarding their rights under federal and state law; and

Ensure that all school districts, primary schools, secondary schools and other similar institutions entering into contracts that govern databases, online services, assessments, special education or instructional supports with private vendors shall include in each such contract a provision that private vendors are permitted to use aggregated data; or an individual student’s data for secondary uses, but only if the vendor discloses in clear detail the secondary uses and receives written permission from the student’s parent or legal guardian. The contract shall also include either of the following: (1) a prohibition on any secondary uses of student data by the private vendor including, but not limited to, sales, marketing or advertising, but permitting the private vendor to process or monitor such data solely to provide and maintain the integrity of the service; or (2) a requirement that the private vendor disclose in detail any secondary uses of student data including, but not limited to, sales, marketing or advertising, and the board shall obtain express parental consent for those secondary uses prior to deployment of the private vendor’s services under the contract.

Unless otherwise approved by the state board of education, any data deemed confidential pursuant to this act shall not be transferred to any federal, state or local agency or other organization or entity outside of the state of Idaho, with the following exceptions:

A student transfers out of state or a school or district seeks help with locating an out-of-state transfer;

A student leaves the state to attend an out-of-state institution of higher education or training program;
(iii) A student voluntarily participates in a program for which such a data transfer is a condition or requirement of participation;

The state board of education or the state department of education may share such data with a vendor to the extent it is necessary as part of a contract that governs databases, online services, assessments, special education or instructional supports with a vendor;

Pursuant to a written agreement between the two (2) school districts, where a student transfers from an Idaho district abutting upon another state to the nearest appropriate district in such neighboring state in accordance with the provisions of section 33-1403, Idaho Code; or

A student is classified as “migrant” for reporting purposes as required by the federal government in order to assure linkage between the various states of migrant students educational records;

Develop a detailed data security plan that includes:

Guidelines for authorizing access to the student data system and to individual student data including guidelines for authentication of authorized access;

Guidelines relating to administrative safeguards providing for the security of electronic and physical data; such guidelines should include provisions relating to data encryption as well as staff training to better ensure the safety and security of data;

Privacy compliance standards;

Privacy and security audits;

Breach planning, notification and procedures; and

Data retention and disposition policies;

Ensure routine and ongoing compliance with FERPA, other relevant privacy laws and policies, and the privacy and security policies and procedures developed under the authority of this act, including the performance of compliance audits;

Ensure that any contracts that govern databases, online services, assessments or instructional supports that include student data and are outsourced to private vendors, include express provisions that safeguard privacy and security, contain the restrictions on secondary uses of student data described in subsection (3)(b)(vi) of this section, provides for data destruction, including a time frame for data destruction, and includes penalties for noncompliance with this paragraph; and

Notify the governor and the legislature annually of the following:

New student data proposed for inclusion in the state student data system: (1) any new student data collection proposed by the state board of education becomes a provisional requirement to allow districts and their local data system vendors the opportunity to meet the new requirement; and (2) the state board of education must submit any new provisional student data collection to the governor and the legislature for their approval within one (1) year in order to make the new student data a permanent requirement through the administrative rules process. Any provisional student data collection not approved by the governor and the legislature by the end of the next legislative session expires and must be deleted and no longer collected;

Changes to existing data collections required for any reason, including changes to federal reporting requirements made by the U.S. department of education;

An explanation of any exceptions granted by the state board of education in the past year regarding the release or out-of-state transfer of student data;

The results of any and all privacy compliance and security audits completed in the past year. Notifications regarding privacy compliance and security audits shall not include any information that would pose a security threat to the state or local student information systems or to the secure transmission of data between state and local systems by exposing vulnerabilities; and
(v) Data collected specific to a grant program where such data is not otherwise included in student data.

The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this act.

Upon the effective date of this act, any existing collection of student data in the data system shall not be considered a new student data collection in accordance with this section.

Unless otherwise prohibited by law or court order, school districts must provide parents or guardians with copies of all of their child’s educational records, upon request, if such child has not attained the age of eighteen (18) years.

The state board of education shall develop a model policy for school districts and public charter schools that will govern data collection, access, security and use of such data. The model policy shall be consistent with the provisions of this act. In order to assure that student educational information is treated safely and securely and in a consistent manner throughout the state, each district and public charter school shall adopt and implement the model policy. The state department of education shall provide outreach and training to the districts and public charter schools to help implement the policy. A current copy of such policy shall be posted to the school district’s website. Any district or public charter school that fails to adopt, implement and post the policy where any inappropriate release of data occurs shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Such civil penalty may be imposed per violation. The method of recovery of the penalty shall be by a civil enforcement action brought by the state board of education, with the assistance of the office of the state attorney general, in the district court in and for the county where the violation occurred. All civil penalties collected under this section shall be paid into the general fund of the state.

No less frequently than annually, the state board of education shall update the data inventory and index of data elements provided for in this subsection.

The state board of education and the state department of education shall ensure that any and all private vendors employed or otherwise engaged by the board or the department shall comply with the provisions of this section. Any person determined, in either a civil enforcement action initiated by the board or initiated by the department or in a court action initiated by an injured party, to have violated a provision of this section or any rule promulgated pursuant to this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation. In the case of an unauthorized release of student data, the state board of education or the state department of education shall notify the parent or student of the unauthorized release of student data that includes personally identifiable information in a manner consistent with the provisions of section 28-51-105, Idaho Code.

33-134. Assessment item review committee.

The state board of education shall establish a committee consisting of thirty (30) individuals, representing each of the six (6) education regions of the state established by the state board of education, to review all summative computer adaptive test questions. The committee’s review shall include reviews for bias and sensitivity. The committee is authorized to make recommendations to the state board of education and the state department of education to revise or eliminate summative computer adaptive test questions from state assessments. The state board of education shall make the final determination regarding the adoption or rejection of the committee’s recommendations. The committee established shall include the following members appointed by the state board of education:
(1)(a) The state board of education shall establish a committee consisting of thirty (30) individuals, representing each of the six (6) education regions of the state established by the state board of education, to review all summative computer adaptive test questions. The committee’s review shall include reviews for bias and sensitivity. The committee is authorized to make recommendations to the state board of education and the state department of education to revise or eliminate summative computer adaptive test questions from state assessments. The state board of education shall make the final determination regarding the adoption or rejection of the committee’s recommendations. The committee established shall include the following members appointed by the state board of education:

Two (2) parents of public school or public charter school students, selected from each of the six (6) education regions in this state;

One (1) public school or public charter school teacher, selected from each of the six (6) education regions in this state;

One (1) member who is an administrator of a school district or public charter school, selected from each of the six (6) education regions in this state; and

One (1) member from the district board of trustees or public charter school board of directors, selected from each of the six (6) education regions in this state.

The state department of education shall provide staff support to the review committee.

The term of office of each committee member appointed shall be four (4) years.

The president of the state board of education shall adjust the length of terms to stagger the terms of committee members so that approximately one-half (½) of the committee members are appointed every two (2) years.

No committee member may receive compensation or benefits for the member’s service on the committee.

The state board of education may solicit recommendations for committee members from districts, public charter schools and other public education stakeholders.

The state board of education shall determine when committee recommendations must be submitted to the state board of education and the state department of education, provided that any such submission date must provide adequate time for the committee to review summative computer adaptive test questions before the assessment is administered to students. Adequate time means no fewer than thirty (30) days from the date the committee is notified of the summative computer adaptive test questions.

The state board is hereby authorized to promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

33-135. Teachers — classroom size — reporting.

Definitions. The following terms have the following meanings:

“Teacher” means an individual holding a teaching certificate issued by the state department of education.

“Classroom” means a place where groups of students meet for instruction in a particular subject, including students enrolled in virtual schools or charter schools.

“Classroom instructor” means an individual holding a teaching certificate issued by the state department of education and who has been assigned to teach students one (1) or more subjects.

“Class size” means the number of students who regularly appear in an instructor’s classroom or on a class roster and for whom the classroom instructor is primarily responsible and accountable.

“Pupil-teacher ratio” means the total number of students in a school building divided by the total number of teachers working in that school building. For the purposes of this act, the term “school building” also includes virtual charter schools.

“Total caseload” means the total number of students serviced by classroom instructors in a secondary school setting.

Reporting.

The state department of education shall gather statistical information using a unified approach that will demonstrate:

The total number of teachers actively employed within an Idaho school district listed by individual school building;

The pupil-teacher ratio for every Idaho school district listed by individual school building;

The number of elementary classroom teachers in every Idaho school building listed by grade and subject;

The number of secondary classroom teachers in every Idaho school building listed by grade and subject;

The class size in every Idaho elementary school building listed by teacher; and

The class size, by each section and by total caseload, in every secondary school building listed by teacher.

The report under this subsection shall be prepared and published once annually by January 1 and shall be made available on a public website maintained by the state department of education.

For purposes of this subsection, each teacher will be identified by a unique numeric identifier and not by individual name.

Statewide database. The state department of education shall maintain a statewide database of the statistical information collected and published.